Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1202.03
Carrying concealed handgun; identification document, required; applicability; violation; penalty.

(1)(a) This section applies to a person who is not otherwise prohibited by state law from possessing or carrying a concealed handgun.

(b) This section does not apply to a qualified law enforcement officer or qualified retired law enforcement officer carrying a concealed handgun pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 926B or 926C, respectively, as such sections existed on January 1, 2023.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any time a person is carrying a concealed handgun, such person shall also carry such person's identification document. The person shall display the identification document when asked to do so by a peace officer or by emergency services personnel.

(3) A person is not required to comply with this section if:

(a) Such person is storing or transporting a handgun in a motor vehicle for any lawful purpose or transporting a handgun directly to or from a motor vehicle to or from any place where such handgun may be lawfully possessed or carried by such person;

(b) Such handgun is unloaded, kept separate from ammunition, and enclosed in a case.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) Emergency services personnel means a volunteer or paid firefighter or rescue squad member or a person licensed to provide emergency medical services pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act or authorized to provide emergency medical services pursuant to the EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact; and

(b) Identification document means a valid:

(i) Driver's or operator's license;

(ii) State identification card;

(iii) Military identification card;

(iv) Alien registration card;

(v) Passport; or

(vi) Tribal enrollment card; and

(c) Tribal enrollment card means an identification document:

(i) Issued by a tribe which is recognized by a state or the federal government; and

(ii) Which contains a photograph of the person identified and such person's date of birth.

(5) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.

Laws 2023, LB77, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 1.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.

EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact, see section 38-3801.